incubator/apertium-hi-en-wx/apertium_hn.dix
<pardef n="gudiy/A__n">					
<e><p><l>A</l><r>A<s n="cat:n"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:s"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>Az</l><r>A<s n="cat:n"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:p"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>A</l><r>A<s n="cat:n"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:s"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>oM</l><r>A<s n="cat:n"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:p"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>					
<pardef n="IrRyA/__n">					
<e><p><l></l><r><s n="cat:n"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:s"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l></l><r><s n="cat:n"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:p"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l></l><r><s n="cat:n"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:s"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l></l><r><s n="cat:n"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:p"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>					
<pardef n="Apawwi/__n">					
<e><p><l></l><r><s n="cat:n"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:s"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>yAz</l><r><s n="cat:n"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:p"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l></l><r><s n="cat:n"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:s"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>yoM</l><r><s n="cat:n"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:p"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>					
<pardef n="SAnwi/__n">					
<e><p><l></l><r><s n="cat:n"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:s"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l></l><r><s n="cat:n"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:p"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l></l><r><s n="cat:n"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:s"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l></l><r><s n="cat:n"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:p"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>					
<pardef n="ladak/I__n">					
<e><p><l>I</l><r>I<s n="cat:n"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:s"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>iyAz</l><r>I<s n="cat:n"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:p"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>I</l><r>I<s n="cat:n"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:s"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>iyoM</l><r>I<s n="cat:n"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:p"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>					
<pardef n="AjAxI/__n">					
<e><p><l></l><r><s n="cat:n"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:s"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l></l><r><s n="cat:n"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:p"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l></l><r><s n="cat:n"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:s"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l></l><r><s n="cat:n"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:p"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>					
<pardef n="qwu/__n">					
<e><p><l></l><r><s n="cat:n"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:s"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>ez</l><r><s n="cat:n"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:p"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l></l><r><s n="cat:n"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:s"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>oM</l><r><s n="cat:n"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:p"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>					
<pardef n="vAyu/__n">					
<e><p><l></l><r><s n="cat:n"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:s"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l></l><r><s n="cat:n"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:p"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l></l><r><s n="cat:n"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:s"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l></l><r><s n="cat:n"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:p"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>					
<pardef n="bah/U__n">					
<e><p><l>U</l><r>U<s n="cat:n"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:s"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>uez</l><r>U<s n="cat:n"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:p"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>uyeM</l><r>U<s n="cat:n"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:p"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>U</l><r>U<s n="cat:n"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:s"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>uoM</l><r>U<s n="cat:n"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:p"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>					
<pardef n="bAlU/__n">					
<e><p><l></l><r><s n="cat:n"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:s"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l></l><r><s n="cat:n"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:p"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l></l><r><s n="cat:n"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:s"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l></l><r><s n="cat:n"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:p"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>					
<pardef n="lO/__n">					
<e><p><l></l><r><s n="cat:n"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:s"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>ez</l><r><s n="cat:n"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:p"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l></l><r><s n="cat:n"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:s"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>voM</l><r><s n="cat:n"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:p"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>					
<pardef n="sarasoM/__n">					
<e><p><l></l><r><s n="cat:n"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:s"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l></l><r><s n="cat:n"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:p"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l></l><r><s n="cat:n"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:s"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l></l><r><s n="cat:n"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:p"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>					
<pardef n="mAz/__n">					
<e><p><l></l><r><s n="cat:n"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:s"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>yeM</l><r><s n="cat:n"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:p"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l></l><r><s n="cat:n"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:s"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>oM</l><r><s n="cat:n"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:p"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>					
<pardef n="Gar/a__n">					
<e><p><l>a</l><r>a<s n="cat:n"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:s"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>a</l><r>a<s n="cat:n"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:p"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>a</l><r>a<s n="cat:n"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:s"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>oM</l><r>a<s n="cat:n"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:p"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>					
<pardef n="Karc/a__n">					
<e><p><l>a</l><r>a<s n="cat:n"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:s"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>e</l><r>a<s n="cat:n"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:p"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>a</l><r>a<s n="cat:n"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:s"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>oM</l><r>a<s n="cat:n"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:p"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>					
<pardef n="kroXa/__n">					
<e><p><l></l><r><s n="cat:n"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:s"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l></l><r><s n="cat:n"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:p"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l></l><r><s n="cat:n"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:s"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l></l><r><s n="cat:n"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:p"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>					
<pardef n="ladak/A__n">					
<e><p><l>A</l><r>A<s n="cat:n"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:s"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>e</l><r>A<s n="cat:n"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:p"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>e</l><r>A<s n="cat:n"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:s"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>oM</l><r>A<s n="cat:n"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:p"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>					
<pardef n="rAjA/__n">					
<e><p><l></l><r><s n="cat:n"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:s"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l></l><r><s n="cat:n"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:p"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l></l><r><s n="cat:n"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:s"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>oM</l><r><s n="cat:n"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:p"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>					
<pardef n="loh/A__n">					
<e><p><l>A</l><r>A<s n="cat:n"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:s"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>e</l><r>A<s n="cat:n"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:p"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>e</l><r>A<s n="cat:n"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:s"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>e</l><r>A<s n="cat:n"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:p"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>					
<pardef n="viXAwA/__n">					
<e><p><l></l><r><s n="cat:n"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:s"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l></l><r><s n="cat:n"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:p"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l></l><r><s n="cat:n"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:s"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l></l><r><s n="cat:n"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:p"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>					

<e lm="adabaMga"><i>adabaMg</i><par n="Karc/a__n"/></e>
<e lm="ammAz"><i>ammAz</i><par n="mAz/__n"/></e>
<e lm="anehA"><i>anehA</i><par n="viXAwA/__n"/></e>
<e lm="aruci"><i>aruci</i><par n="SAnwi/__n"/></e>
<e lm="asamiyA"><i>asamiyA</i><par n="IrRyA/__n"/></e>
<e lm="awimqwyu"><i>awimqwyu</i><par n="vAyu/__n"/></e>
<e lm="aXErya"><i>aXErya</i><par n="kroXa/__n"/></e>
<e lm="axvAra"><i>axvAr</i><par n="Gar/a__n"/></e>
<e lm="Ayu"><i>Ayu</i><par n="vAyu/__n"/></e>
<e lm="bAhu"><i>bAhu</i><par n="qwu/__n"/></e>
<e lm="bAlU"><i>bAlU</i><par n="bAlU/__n"/></e>
<e lm="bitiA"><i>biti</i><par n="gudiy/A__n"/></e>
<e lm="brahmagraMWi"><i>brahmagraMWi</i><par n="Apawwi/__n"/></e>
<e lm="brahmA"><i>brahmA</i><par n="viXAwA/__n"/></e>
<e lm="BrAwA"><i>BrAwA</i><par n="rAjA/__n"/></e>
<e lm="BrU"><i>Br</i><par n="bah/U__n"/></e>
<e lm="bU"><i>bU</i><par n="bAlU/__n"/></e>
<e lm="cappA"><i>capp</i><par n="ladak/A__n"/></e>
<e lm="CiCalA"><i>CiCal</i><par n="loh/A__n"/></e>
<e lm="cidiyA"><i>cidiy</i><par n="gudiy/A__n"/></e>
<e lm="ciwrokwi"><i>ciwrokwi</i><par n="SAnwi/__n"/></e>
<e lm="cUdI"><i>cUd</i><par n="ladak/I__n"/></e>
<e lm="DalavAz"><i>DalavAz</i><par n="mAz/__n"/></e>
<e lm="DaluAz"><i>DaluAz</i><par n="mAz/__n"/></e>
<e lm="ejaMsI"><i>ejaMsI</i><par n="AjAxI/__n"/></e>
<e lm="gO"><i>gO</i><par n="lO/__n"/></e>
<e lm="gopaxa"><i>gopax</i><par n="Gar/a__n"/></e>
<e lm="guPwagU"><i>guPwagU</i><par n="bAlU/__n"/></e>
<e lm="harIwimA"><i>harIwimA</i><par n="IrRyA/__n"/></e>
<e lm="haWaPera"><i>haWaPera</i><par n="kroXa/__n"/></e>
<e lm="homaXenu"><i>homaXenu</i><par n="qwu/__n"/></e>
<e lm="iMkA"><i>iMk</i><par n="ladak/A__n"/></e>
<e lm="jorU"><i>jor</i><par n="bah/U__n"/></e>
<e lm="juA"><i>ju</i><par n="loh/A__n"/></e>
<e lm="Karca"><i>Karc</i><par n="Karc/a__n"/></e>
<e lm="karja"><i>karj</i><par n="Karc/a__n"/></e>
<e lm="kasAkasI"><i>kasAkasI</i><par n="AjAxI/__n"/></e>
<e lm="kiRkiMXyA"><i>kiRkiMXyA</i><par n="viXAwA/__n"/></e>
<e lm="kolI"><i>kol</i><par n="ladak/I__n"/></e>
<e lm="koTariyA"><i>koTariy</i><par n="gudiy/A__n"/></e>
<e lm="lO"><i>lO</i><par n="lO/__n"/></e>
<e lm="lU"><i>lU</i><par n="bAlU/__n"/></e>
<e lm="mAjarA"><i>mAjar</i><par n="ladak/A__n"/></e>
<e lm="mAz"><i>mAz</i><par n="mAz/__n"/></e>
<e lm="nAnA"><i>nAnA</i><par n="rAjA/__n"/></e>
<e lm="naPA"><i>naP</i><par n="loh/A__n"/></e>
<e lm="navalavaXU"><i>navalavaX</i><par n="bah/U__n"/></e>
<e lm="navarARtra"><i>navarARtr</i><par n="Gar/a__n"/></e>
<e lm="navaXAwu"><i>navaXAwu</i><par n="qwu/__n"/></e>
<e lm="nawi"><i>nawi</i><par n="Apawwi/__n"/></e>
<e lm="naxiyA"><i>naxiy</i><par n="gudiy/A__n"/></e>
<e lm="nekanamI"><i>nekanamI</i><par n="AjAxI/__n"/></e>
<e lm="pAMcoM"><i>pAMcoM</i><par n="sarasoM/__n"/></e>
<e lm="parAXIna"><i>parAXIna</i><par n="kroXa/__n"/></e>
<e lm="parvawavAsinI"><i>parvawavAsin</i><par n="ladak/I__n"/></e>
<e lm="PIwA"><i>PIw</i><par n="ladak/A__n"/></e>
<e lm="prANavAyu"><i>prANavAyu</i><par n="vAyu/__n"/></e>
<e lm="prawirakRA"><i>prawirakRA</i><par n="IrRyA/__n"/></e>
<e lm="prawiSruwi"><i>prawiSruwi</i><par n="Apawwi/__n"/></e>
<e lm="prewaSuxXi"><i>prewaSuxXi</i><par n="SAnwi/__n"/></e>
<e lm="puwravaXU"><i>puwravaX</i><par n="bah/U__n"/></e>
<e lm="rAjA"><i>rAjA</i><par n="rAjA/__n"/></e>
<e lm="rajju"><i>rajju</i><par n="qwu/__n"/></e>
<e lm="saM"><i>saM</i><par n="sarasoM/__n"/></e>
<e lm="sanniXi"><i>sanniXi</i><par n="Apawwi/__n"/></e>
<e lm="sarasoM"><i>sarasoM</i><par n="sarasoM/__n"/></e>
<e lm="speSala"><i>speSal</i><par n="Gar/a__n"/></e>
<e lm="SqMganAxa"><i>SqMganAxa</i><par n="kroXa/__n"/></e>
<e lm="SqMgArajanmA"><i>SqMgArajanm</i><par n="loh/A__n"/></e>
<e lm="sUkarI"><i>sUkar</i><par n="ladak/I__n"/></e>
<e lm="udIsA"><i>udIsA</i><par n="viXAwA/__n"/></e>
<e lm="upapawnI"><i>upapawnI</i><par n="AjAxI/__n"/></e>
<e lm="vAyu"><i>vAyu</i><par n="vAyu/__n"/></e>
<e lm="vijAnawA"><i>vijAnawA</i><par n="IrRyA/__n"/></e>
<e lm="werahIM"><i>werahIM</i><par n="sarasoM/__n"/></e>
<e lm="xAwA"><i>xAwA</i><par n="rAjA/__n"/></e>
<e lm="xuRkIrwi"><i>xuRkIrwi</i><par n="SAnwi/__n"/></e>
